Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2 MOTOR VEHICLE EMISSION INSPECTION AND MAINTENANCE
12-9-49. Application to conduct emission inspections; certificate of authorization.

Any garage or other establishment which desires to conduct emission inspections shall submit to the director an application for a certificate of authorization under this article. Applications shall be made upon a form designated by the director and shall contain such information as may be required by the director.

A certificate of authorization and certificate of emission inspection shall be issued only after the director has made a determination that the applicant's proposed inspection station will be properly equipped, has the necessary licensed mechanic inspectors to conduct inspections, and meets all other requirements of this article.

The board shall not in any manner limit the number, location, and types of authorized inspection stations certified to operate in any nonattainment area, county, or any portion of a county or area. In no event shall the board enter into any contract or into a series of contracts the effect of which will be the realization of centralized testing.

The director, prior to issuing a certificate of authorization, shall require proof that the applicant has either filed a bond or has obtained liability insurance in a form and amount satisfactory to the director to ensure compensation for any damage to a vehicle during an inspection or adjustment caused by negligence of the applicant or its agent.

With respect to any certificate of authorization issued to any emission inspection station licensed, authorized, or certified by the department to inspect responsible motor vehicle emissions, responsible motor vehicle emission control equipment, and on-board diagnostic equipment for compliance with the requirements of this article, the following shall apply:

The director shall ensure the operation of such official emission inspection stations of a number, at locations, and in a condition satisfactory to the director and in conformance with all standards, requirements, and specifications prescribed for such inspection stations, procedures, personnel, and equipment by the board pursuant to this article; and each official emission inspection station shall keep a record of inspections, reinspections, the results thereof, and certificates of inspection issued in a manner designated by the department and in conformance with any requirements for such records and reports prescribed by the board. All records required in this article to be maintained by an official emission inspection station shall be available for inspection at all reasonable times;

Any official emission inspection station licensed, permitted, or established under this Code section shall be required to perform inspections on responsible motor vehicles in conformity with regulations or requirements established, prescribed, or promulgated by the board pursuant to this article. Such requirements shall ensure that uniform equipment is utilized and that emission inspections produce consistent results throughout affected areas of the state;

A fee as provided in paragraphs (9) and (10) of subsection (a) of Code Section

12-9-46

shall be charged by each emission inspection station for performance of the emission inspection and inspection of emission control devices and on-board diagnostic equipment on responsible motor vehicles;

The director shall supervise and cause inspections to be made of the emission inspection stations, licensed, authorized, or certified pursuant to this article and shall ensure compliance with all applicable requirements of, under, or pursuant to this article relating to such inspections, inspection stations, and inspection personnel;

No certificate of authorization for an emission inspection station shall be assigned or transferred or used in any location other than the one designated on such certificate; and

Every certificate of authorization for an emission inspection station and mechanic inspector license shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the station.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 8.)

12-9-50. Authority to inspect, monitor, or investigate inspection stations.

Any duly appointed agent of the director, including without limitation any person with whom the board has contracted pursuant to paragraph (12) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-9-46, may enter private or public property at reasonable times and upon presentation of the agent's credentials to inspect, monitor, or investigate the operation of any emission inspection station or any establishment suspected of holding itself out as being an emission inspection station to determine whether such emission inspection station or establishment is in compliance with the requirements of this article; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall prohibit other investigative techniques from being utilized by the director.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 9; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1524, § 2.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, "provided, however" was substituted for "provided however" near the end of this Code section.

12-9-51. Emission inspection required for motor vehicle registration; operation without registration; improper reuse.

Beginning July 1, 1992, it shall be unlawful for any county to and no county shall register any responsible motor vehicle subject to any requirement under Code Section 12-9-45 pursuant to or subject to the requirements of Chapter 2 of Title 40 without proof of a valid certificate of emission inspection issued pursuant to Code Section 12-9-48 indicating that such responsible motor vehicle satisfied all applicable requirements of Code Section 12-9-45 and Code Section 12-9-48. In applying for a motor vehicle registration for a responsible motor vehicle subject to any requirement under Code Section 12-9-45, the application shall be accompanied by proof of the issuance of a certificate of emission inspection issued pursuant to Code Section 12-9-48. Any county which registers any responsible motor vehicle without proof of a certificate of emission inspection shall be in violation of this article.

It shall be unlawful to and no person shall operate a responsible motor vehicle subject to any requirement under Code Section 12-9-45 on the roadways of this state without a valid registration issued in compliance with this article. Any person who operates a responsible motor vehicle subject to any requirement under Code Section 12-9-45 on the roadways of this state without a valid registration issued in compliance with this article shall be considered to be operating an unregistered motor vehicle.

The board may provide for a procedure to be implemented by each county to ensure that certificates of emission inspection are not improperly reused.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 10.)

12-9-52. Amendment, modification, revocation, or suspension of certificate of authorization.

The director may amend, modify, revoke, or suspend any certificate of authorization issued to an emission inspection station or any license issued to a mechanic inspector for cause, including but not limited to:

Violating the provisions of this article concerning the inspection of any responsible motor vehicle;

A determination by the board that the number, location, or type of certified inspection stations or licensed mechanic inspectors needs to be limited to ensure effective implementation of this article or to comply with the requirements of the federal Clean Air Act, as amended; or

Receipt of a request for an amendment, modification, suspension, or revocation by the emission inspection station or mechanic inspector.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2.)

12-9-53. Review of director's decision.

Review of a decision of the director under this article shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-9-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1524, § 3.)

12-9-54. Sale of vehicle.

No person shall sell any motor vehicle which is intended for highway use if such vehicle is at the time of the sale a responsible motor vehicle required to have a certificate of emission inspection under Code Section 12-9-45, unless there appears on such vehicle an unexpired valid certificate of emission inspection issued pursuant to this article. Any person violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of $100.00 for a first offense, $500.00 for a second offense, and $1,000.00 for each subsequent offense. If, as a result of the sale of a responsible motor vehicle subject to any requirement under Code Section 12-9-45, such motor vehicle would not, if immediately registered by the purchaser as provided by law, be registered in a county in which the requirements of Code Section 12-9-45 are applicable, this Code section shall not apply.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2.)

12-9-55. Prohibited acts; registration of vehicle by county without proof of inspection; penalty; withholding of funding.

No person shall in any manner represent any place or establishment as an official emission inspection station unless such station has been issued a valid certificate of authorization by the department.

No person shall issue a certificate of emission inspection for any responsible motor vehicle unless such person holds a valid certificate of authorization issued pursuant to this article and such vehicle has been inspected and approved by a licensed mechanic inspector as required by this article.

No person shall make, issue, or knowingly use any imitation or counterfeit of an official certificate of emission inspection.

No person shall possess, display, or cause or permit to be displayed upon any vehicle any emission inspection sticker knowing the same to be counterfeit or issued for another vehicle or issued without the required inspection and approval.

No person shall use for the purpose of proof under subsection (d) of Code Section 12-9-48 any receipt or document purporting to show cost of repair or maintenance or replacement of equipment unless such receipt or document accurately represents costs actually incurred by such person with respect to the responsible motor vehicle for which the certificate of emissions is sought.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate or permit to be operated on any highway of this state a responsible motor vehicle registered in any county subject to this article pursuant to or subject to the requirements of Chapter 2 of Title 40, which is at the time of operation required to have a certificate of emission inspection under Code Section 12-9-45, without a valid certificate of emission inspection and emission inspection sticker, if required. If the owner of any motor vehicle who has been notified of the requirement of an emission inspection pursuant to paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-9-47 fails to have the vehicle inspected within 30 days after receipt of such notice, such vehicle shall be in violation of this article and any certificate of emission inspection and any emission inspection sticker previously issued for such vehicle shall be deemed invalid. For purposes of this subsection, each day of operation or permission is a separate offense.

It shall be unlawful to register, or cause to be registered, a responsible motor vehicle in any county other than the county wherein such vehicle is required to be registered by Chapter 2 of Title 40 for the purpose of avoiding any requirement of this article. Each day of continued unlawful registration shall be a separate offense.

With respect to any responsible motor vehicle subject to any requirement under this article, it shall be unlawful for the purpose of avoiding any requirement of this article to render unserviceable by removal, alteration, lack of maintenance, or other interference with its operation any emission control equipment or on-board diagnostic equipment required on such responsible motor vehicle when such vehicle was new by the federal Clean Air Act and required by the regulations of the board promulgated pursuant to this article to be inspected and maintained. Each day of such unserviceability shall be a separate offense.

Any person violating any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $50.00 nor more than $1,000.00.

Any person violating any provision of this article, or rules or regulations under this article, or refusing to comply with any final order issued under this article shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00 per day; provided, however, that in no instance shall any person be both liable for a civil penalty under this subsection and subjected to a criminal prosecution pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section. Upon a showing that a civil proceeding has been commenced to assess a civil penalty, a court to which a criminal citation for a violation of subsection (f) of this Code section has been presented shall stay the criminal proceeding until the civil penalty proceeding has been completed. If a civil penalty is assessed, the criminal proceeding shall be dismissed.

It shall be unlawful for any person to violate any provision of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this article.

If it is determined that any county has registered responsible motor vehicles without receiving proof from the owners that the responsible motor vehicles satisfy all applicable requirements of Code Sections

12-9-45

and

12-9-48

, the director shall notify the commissioner of transportation that such an unlawful act has occurred. Upon such notification, the State Transportation Board may at its discretion withhold Department of Transportation funding assistance from any such county.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 11; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1524, § 4.)

Cross references.

- Jurisdiction of recorder's, mayor's, or police courts to dispose of cases under Code section,

§

36-32-8

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "for" was deleted preceding "responsible" in the first sentence of subsection (g) (now subsection (i)).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, "Code Sections 12-9-45 and 12-9-48" was substituted for "Code Section 12-9-45 and Code Section 12-9-48" near the middle of subsection (i).

U.S. Code.

- The federal Clean Air Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 42 U.S.C.

§

7401 et seq.

12-9-56. Rules and regulations.

When duly promulgated and adopted, all rules and regulations issued pursuant to this article by the board shall have the force of law.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2.)

12-9-57. Effect of federal Clean Air Act requirements; repeal of article.

This article shall remain of force and effect only so long as the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 7401, et seq., as amended, requires the State of Georgia to maintain and enforce the inspection plan and program provided for in this article in order to reduce the ambient air levels of ozone or carbon monoxide which exceed the levels specified by the National Ambient Air Quality Standards for such pollutants specified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to said act. Upon the effective date of an amendment to the federal Clean Air Act which allows the State of Georgia to discontinue the maintenance and enforcement of the inspection program provided for in this article without the imposition of sanctions against the State of Georgia such as the loss of federal funds for sewage treatment plants, transportation projects, air quality improvement projects, a moratorium on development within any area of the state, or other substantial penalty, this article shall be repealed.

(Code 1981, §

12-9-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 918, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 336, § 12.)

Cross references.

- National Primary and Secondary Ambient Air Quality Standards, 40 C.F.R.

§

50.1 et seq. (1982).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a comma was inserted following "as amended" and a period was inserted following "U.S.C" in the first sentence.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1992, p. 912,

§

2/HB 1440, provided that this article shall be repealed upon the effective date of an amendment to the federal Clean Air Act allowing the state to discontinue the maintenance and enforcement of the inspection program. As of August, 2020, there had been no such amendment to the federal Clean Air Act.

U.S. Code.

- The federal Clean Air Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 42 U.S.C.

§

7401 et seq.